Arkansas, session 2025, HB1341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-10-102(26), concerning the definition of
"pay" as applied to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, is
amended to read as follows:
(26)(A) “Pay” means the recurring remuneration paid an employee
for personal services rendered by the employee in a position covered by the
system and shall not exceed the amount the employee is required to report for
federal income tax purposes.
(B) In determining pay, consideration shall not be given
to:
(i) Special single-sum payments paid by an employer;
(ii) Employer contributions to any employee benefit
plan; or
*LJH081*
03-31-2025 13:17:13 LJH081

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 H3/31/25 HB1341
(iii) Any other unusual or nonrecurring remuneration.
(C)(i) An active member who is receiving temporary
workers' compensation benefits for an injury or illness incurred in the
course of his or her covered employment may remit the temporary workers'
compensation benefits to his or her employer.
(ii) If an active member remits temporary worker's
compensation benefits to his or her employer under subdivision (26)(C)(i) of
this section, the employer shall report the total pay to the system.
(iii) If an active member remits temporary worker's
compensation benefits to his or her employer under subdivision (26)(C)(i) of
this section, the reported pay for any month shall not be greater than the
pay that would have been earned by the active member if the active member had
not been receiving temporary workers' compensation benefits.
(C)(D) Annual compensation in excess of the limitations
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. §401(a), as it existed on
January 1, 2011 2025, shall be disregarded;

/s/Warren


















03-31-2025 13:17:13 LJH081